Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 5. Driver License Violations.

Sec. 28.15.280.
Use of foreign license. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.281.
Unlawful use of license; permitting unauthorized person to drive.

A person may not

display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in the person’s possession a canceled, suspended, revoked, fictitious, or unlawfully altered driver’s license;

display or represent as the person’s own a driver’s license not issued to the person;

display or present a driver’s license other than an Alaska driver’s license to a peace officer or to the department when that person has been licensed under this chapter; or

lend the person’s driver’s license to another person or knowingly permit the use of the license by another.

A person may not authorize or knowingly permit a motor vehicle owned by the person or under the control of the person to be driven in this state by a person who is not validly licensed.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Secs. 28.15.282 — 28.15.290.
Point system; unlawful use of license. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.291.
Driving while license canceled, suspended, revoked, or in violation of a limitation.

A person commits the crime of driving while license canceled, suspended, revoked, or in violation of a limitation if the person drives

a motor vehicle on a highway or vehicular way or area at a time when that person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license has been canceled, suspended, or revoked under circumstances described in AS

28.15.181

or

28.15.182

or a similar law in another jurisdiction;

a motor vehicle on a highway or vehicular way or area at a time when that person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license has been canceled, suspended, or revoked under circumstances other than those described in (1) of this subsection; or

in violation of a limitation placed on that person’s license or privilege to drive in this or another jurisdiction.

Driving while license canceled, suspended, revoked, or in violation of a limitation is

a class A misdemeanor if the person

violates (a)(1) of this section; upon conviction, the court shall impose a minimum sentence of imprisonment of not less than 10 days

with 10 days suspended if the person has not been previously convicted under (a)(1) of this section or a similar law of another jurisdiction; or

if the person has been previously convicted under (a)(1) of this section or a similar law in another jurisdiction; or

violates (a)(2) or (3) of this section and the person has been previously convicted under (a) of this section;

an infraction if the person violates (a)(2) or (3) of this section.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (a) of this section that the person’s license was suspended under AS

28.22.041

and the person provides proof of liability insurance meeting the requirements of AS 28.22 and proof that the insurance was in effect at the time of the accident that led to the suspension.

In this section, “previously convicted” means having been convicted in this or another jurisdiction, within 10 years preceding the date of the present offense, of a violation of this section, of AS

28.33.150

, or another law or ordinance with substantially similar elements.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 10, 11 ch 77 SLA 1983; am § 22 ch 119 SLA 1990; am § 14 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 59 SLA 1993; am § 18 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 85 SLA 2010; am §§ 104, 105 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
92, 93 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (d); relettered in 2008, at which time subsection (c) was relettered as (d).

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(a)(34) and (35), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective September 2, 2008, added subsection (d) [now (c)].

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in (b)(1)(C) and (b)(1)(D), added “or if the person was driving in violation of an ignition interlock device requirement following that revocation,” following “following that revocation”, and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, rewrote (a) and (b).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, substituted “AS

28.15.181

or

28.15.182

” for “AS

28.15.181

(c)” in (a)(1); added (b)(1)(B), and made related stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to (a) and (b) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Secs. 28.15.300 — 28.15.320.
Miscellaneous offenses. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.330.
Making false statement. [Repealed, § 20 ch 241 SLA 1976.]

Secs. 28.15.340 — 28.15.360.
Fees; definitions. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]